apertium-cak.cak.twol
Alphabet 

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ä ë ï ö ü ʼ
%{w%}:0 %{w%}:w
%{n%}:0 %{n%}:n %{n%}:w
%{i%}:0 %{i%}:i
%{u%}:0 %{u%}:u
%{r%}:0 %{r%}:r
%{o%}:u %{o%}:o
%{ö%}:ü %{ö%}:ö
%{a%}:0 %{a%}:a
%{ъ%}:0 %{ъ%}:ʼ
%{t%}:0 %{t%}:t
%{V%}:0 %{V%}:a %{V%}:e %{V%}:i %{V%}:o %{V%}:u

%>:%>
%{≤%}:0

; 

Sets 

Tense = i ü u e ö o a ;
Lax = ï ë ä ; 

Vow = Tense Lax ;

Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ʼ ; 

Rules

"Epenthetic {w} between vowels"
%{w%}:w <=> :Vow _ %>: Vow ;

"Vowels in possessives delete before vowel"
Vx:0 <=> _ %>: :Vow  ; 
     where Vx in ( %{i%} %{a%} %{u%} ) ;

"Possessive alternation of nu-, w-"
%{n%}:w <=> _ %{u%}:0 %>: :Vow ; 

!@ {n}:w {u}:0 >:0 ä j

"Possessive alternation of nu-, w-"
%{n%}:n <=> _ %{u%}: %>: Cns ; 

"Alternation of {n} in verbal prefixes"
%{n%}:n <=>  i _ %>: :Vow ; 
             i _ %>: k ;

"Alternation of {ъ} in verbal prefixes"
%{ъ%}:ʼ <=> _ %>: :Vow ; 

"Alternation of {t}"
%{t%}:0 <=> _ %>: :Cns ; 

"Lax to tense upon possession and infinitive"
Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns: %{≤%}: ;
      where Vx in ( ï ë ä ö ü ) 
            Vy in ( i e a o u ) 
      matched ; 

!@ x >:0 t z ʼ ë:e t {≤}:0 >:0 {V}:e t ä j

"Alternation in infinitive suffix"
Vx:Vy <=> :u ?* %>: _ ; 
       where Vx in ( %{ö%} %{o%} ) 
             Vy in (   ü     u   ) 
       matched ; 

"Suffix vowel repeats root vowel"
%{V%}:Vx <=> :Vy [ :Cns | :0 ]+ %>: _ ; 
      where Vy in ( ä ë ï ö ü a e i o u ) 
            Vx in ( a e i o u a e i o u ) 
      matched ; 

!@ x >:0 t z ʼ ë:e t {≤}:0 >:0 {V}:e t ä j

"{r}"
%{r%}:0 <=> [ :Cns - :j ] %>: _ ; 
